Vermont, session 2025-2026, H384.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4212 is added to read:
§ 4212. MINIMUM REIMBURSEMENT RATES FOR LABOR
(a) The Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall conduct a market
survey of the hourly labor rates charged by automobile repair facilities in
Vermont. In addition, the Commissioner shall investigate the labor rates paid
by automobile insurance companies for repair work in Vermont. The
Commissioner shall compare these rates with the average rates in other New
England states and may review any additional data the Commissioner deems
relevant to such rates, such as national data.
VT LEG #380736 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.384
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) After assessing the data collected under subsection (a) of this section,
the Commissioner shall establish a minimum hourly insurance reimbursement
rate for labor that applies to both first- and third-party automobile insurance
claims. The rate shall be a fair and reasonable amount that takes into
consideration prevailing competitive prices. In addition, the Commissioner
shall establish a formula for annually adjusting the minimum labor rate based
on the Consumer Price Index published by the U.S. Bureau of Labor and
Statistics.
(c) The minimum reimbursement rate established under subsection (b) of
this section shall apply to all insurance claims filed on or after January 1, 2026.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a claimant and an
insurer from negotiating a higher labor rate that takes into consideration factors
such as vehicle type; body composition materials; labor type; required labor
expertise, training, and certifications; equipment; and geographic area of the
chosen repair shop. An insurer shall not refuse to negotiate on the basis of its
ability to obtain a price that it can secure from another licensed repair facility
conveniently located to the claimant.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380736 v.1